Connecticut, session 2026, HB05527.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 1-2 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
Each provision of the general statutes, the special acts or the charter
of any town, city or borough which requires the insertion of an
advertisement of a legal notice in a daily newspaper shall be construed
to permit such advertisement to be inserted in a weekly newspaper or,
if such provision applies to a town, city or borough, both posted on the
Internet web site of the town, city or borough and a printed copy posted
in the town or city hall and not less than two other conspicuous public
municipal locations in a central location in the town, city or borough,
including, but not limited to, a library or senior center, in lieu of a
newspaper; but this section shall not be construed to reduce or
otherwise affect the time required by law for giving such notice.
Whenever notice of any action or other proceeding is required to be
LCO No. 2711 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 5527
given by publication in a newspaper, either by statute or order of court,
the newspaper selected for that purpose, unless otherwise expressly
prescribed, shall be one having a substantial circulation in the town in
which at least one of the parties, for whose benefit such notice is given,
resides.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 1-2